Indiana, session 2026, HB1085.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 34-13-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2021,
SECTION 102, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) This chapter applies to a
claim or suit in tort against any of the following:
(1) The bureau of motor vehicles commission established by
IC 9-14-9-1.
(2) A member of the bureau of motor vehicles commission board
established under IC 9-14-9-2.
(3) An employee of the bureau of motor vehicles commission.
(4) A member of the driver education advisory board established
by IC 9-27-6-5.
(5) An approved postsecondary educational institution (as defined
in IC 21-7-13-6(a)(1)), or an association acting on behalf of an
approved postsecondary educational institution, that:
(A) shares data with the commission for higher education
under IC 21-12-12-1; and
(B) is named as a defendant in a claim or suit in tort based on
2026 IN 1085—LS 6480/DI 106


any breach of the confidentiality of the data that occurs after
the institution has transmitted the data in compliance with
IC 21-12-12-1.
(6) The state fair commission established by IC 15-13-2-1.
(7) A member of the state fair commission established by
IC 15-13-2-1 or an employee of the state fair commission.
(8) The state fair board established by IC 15-13-5-1.
(9) A member of the state fair board established by IC 15-13-5-1.
(b) Section 3 of this chapter does not apply to an action brought
under IC 34-24-6-7.
SECTION 2. IC 34-13-3-2.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2021,
SECTION 103, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. The addition of section 2(5)
2(a)(5) of this chapter by SEA 146-2016, SECTION 1, does not apply
to a claim or suit in tort against a postsecondary educational institution
if filed before March 30, 2016.
SECTION 3. IC 34-24-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 6. Child Sexual Abuse Material
Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), this chapter does
not apply to:
(1) a newspaper or news service that publishes news related
information through an interactive computer service; or
(2) an interactive computer service provider that solely
provides access or connection to an interactive computer
service or other Internet content that is not under the control
of that interactive computer service provider.
(b) This chapter applies to a person that is:
(1) an information content provider of prohibited material; or
(2) an interactive computer service provider that has actual
knowledge from its own oversight efforts, from notice
provided by another person, or from any other source that its
interactive computer service contains prohibited material,
unless, as soon possible after learning of the prohibited
material, the person takes immediate voluntary good faith
actions to remove or block access to the prohibited material.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "child sexual abuse material" has
the meaning set forth in IC 35-36-10-2.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "information content provider"
has the meaning set forth in 47 U.S.C. 230(f)(3). The term includes
a person that:
2026 IN 1085—LS 6480/DI 106


(1) knowingly engages in conduct, including the use of
computer programming, algorithms, artificial intelligence, or
other technology that the person knows is likely to induce
another information content provider to:
(A) disseminate prohibited material on the person's
interactive computer service; or
(B) allow or facilitate access to prohibited material by
means of the person's interactive computer service; or
(2) otherwise materially contributes to the prohibited
character of the content.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "interactive computer service
provider" means a person that provides interactive computer
service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 230(f)(2). The term includes its
affiliates or subsidiaries.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "obscene material" means a
matter or performance described in IC 35-49-2-1.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "prohibited material" means
child sexual abuse material or obscene material.
Sec. 7. (a) If a person:
(1) knowingly or intentionally allows or facilitates access to
prohibited material on an interactive computer service;
(2) knowingly or intentionally disseminates prohibited
material by any means on an interactive computer service; or
(3) is an information content provider of prohibited material
through an interactive computer service;
an individual depicted in the prohibited material, or an individual
exposed to the obscene material, may bring a civil action against
the person.
(b) If the individual depicted in the prohibited material or
exposed to the obscene material is a child less than eighteen (18)
years of age, the child's parent or guardian may bring a civil action
against the person.
(c) An individual who prevails in an action described in this
section is entitled to:
(1) actual damages;
(2) liquidated damages of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000);
(3) punitive damages;
(4) injunctive relief; and
(5) court costs, reasonable attorney's fees, and other
reasonable expenses of litigation, including expert witness
fees.
Sec. 8. The attorney general may bring an action for injunctive
2026 IN 1085—LS 6480/DI 106


relief against a person who violates section 7(a)(1) through 7(a)(3)
of this chapter.
Sec. 9. (a) The immunities in IC 34-13-3-3 (tort claims
immunities) do not apply to an action brought under section 7 of
this chapter.
(b) An action brought by:
(1) an individual under section 7 of this chapter; and
(2) the attorney general under section 8 of this chapter;
may be brought without the requirement of exhausting
administrative remedies, if applicable.
SECTION 4. IC 34-51-2-6 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) In an action
based on fault that is brought against:
(1) one (1) defendant; or
(2) two (2) or more defendants who may be treated as a single
party;
the claimant is barred from recovery if the claimant's contributory fault
is greater than the fault of all persons whose fault proximately
contributed to the claimant's damages.
(b) In an action based on fault that is brought against two (2) or
more defendants, the claimant is barred from recovery if the claimant's
contributory fault is greater than the fault of all persons whose fault
proximately contributed to the claimant's damages.
(c) This section does not apply to an action brought under
IC 34-24-6-7.
2026 IN 1085—LS 6480/DI 106